Utah statutes.
76-6-107.   Graffiti defined -- Penalties -- Removal costs -- Reimbursement
liability.
(1)  "Graffiti" means any form of unauthorized printing, writing, spraying,
scratching, affixing, or inscribing on the property of another regardless of
the content or nature of the material used in the commission of the act.
(2)  "Victim" means the person or entity whose property was defaced by the
graffiti and bears the expense for its removal.
(3)  Graffiti is a:
(a)  second degree felony if the damage caused is in excess of $5,000;
(b)  third degree felony if the damage caused is in excess of $1,000;
(c)  class A misdemeanor if the damage caused is equal to or in excess of
$300; and
(d)  class B misdemeanor if the damage caused is less than $300.
(4)  Damages under Subsection (3) include removal costs, repair costs, or
replacement costs, whichever is less.
(5)  The court, upon conviction or adjudication, shall order restitution to
the victim in the amount of removal, repair, or replacement costs.
(6)  An additional amount of $1,000 in restitution shall be added to removal
costs if the graffiti is positioned on an overpass or an underpass, requires
that traffic be interfered with in order to remove it, or the entity
responsible for the area in which the clean-up is to take place must provide
assistance in order for the removal to take place safely.
(7)  A person who voluntarily and at his own expense, removes graffiti for
which he is responsible may be credited for the removal costs against
restitution ordered by a court.
